Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2306
Permit; application; fee; administrative fee; expiration of permit.

(1) On and after August 1, 1999, any person required to obtain a permit under section 54-2305 shall file an application with the department in the manner established by the department. Such application shall include:

(a) The name, residence, and place of business of the applicant;

(b) The exact description of the land upon which the domesticated cervine animal facility is to be located and the nature of the applicant's title to the land, whether in fee or under lease; and

(c) The kind and number of domesticated cervine animals authorized to be kept or reared in such facility.

(2) The department may by rule and regulation prescribe additional information to be contained in such application. The application shall be filed annually with the department on or before October 1 of each year. The annual fee for a domesticated cervine animal facility permit shall not be less than ten dollars nor more than two hundred dollars, as established by the department. Permittees not filing by October 1 shall be considered delinquent. The department may assess an administrative fee for delinquency, not to exceed one hundred dollars per month or a portion of a month, in addition to the permit fees. The purpose of the additional administrative fee is to cover the administrative costs associated with collecting fees. Such permits shall expire on December 31 of the year of issuance.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB909, § 10.